Maryland, session 2026, HB0454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(NN–1) “SAVE PROGRAM” MEANS THE FEDERAL SYSTEMATIC ALIEN
VERIFICATION OF ENTITLEMENT (SAVE) PROGRAM OPERATED BY THE U.S.
CITIZENSHIP AND IMMIGRATION SERVICES IN THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
HOMELAND SECURITY.
3–101.
(a) There shall be a statewide voter registration list.
(c) The State Administrator shall:
(1) define, maintain, and administer the statewide voter registration list;
(2) with the local boards, ensure the currency and accuracy of each
individual voter’s registration record;
(3) instruct the local boards on:
(i) processing voter registration applications and name and address
changes;
(ii) entering voter registration information into the statewide voter
registration list; and
(iii) removing from the statewide voter registration list information
about voters who are no longer eligible to be registered voters; [and]
(4) subject to relevant federal law and to regulations adopted by the State
Board, establish and conduct a program to identify voters who have changed their
addresses; AND
(5) ENROLL THE STATE IN THE SAVE PROGRAM FOR THE PURPOSE
OF VERIFYING THE U.S. CITIZENSHIP OF INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE APPLIED TO

HOUSE BILL 454 3
REGISTER TO VOTE OR HAVE REGISTERED TO VOTE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE.
3–102.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual may
become registered to vote if the individual:
(i) is a citizen of the United States;
(ii) is at least 16 years old;
(iii) is a resident of the State as of the day the individual seeks to
register; and
(iv) registers pursuant to this title.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection, an individual
under the age of 18 years:
(i) may vote in a primary election in which candidates are
nominated for a general or special election that will occur when the individual is at least
18 years old; and
(ii) may not vote in any other election.
3–301.
(a) When a voter registration application is received by a local board, the local
board shall:
(1) if the applicant resides in the county of the local board, determine
whether the applicant is qualified to become a registered voter, INCLUDING BY
VERIFYING THE U.S. CITIZENSHIP OF THE APPLICANT THROUGH THE SAVE
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE STATE BOARD; or
(2) if the applicant resides in a different county in the State, immediately
forward the application to the proper county.
(b) The information contained in the voter registration application for a qualified
applicant shall be electronically entered into the statewide voter registration list on an
expedited basis at the time voter registration information is provided to the local board and
shall be assigned to the county in which the applicant resides unless registration is closed
pursuant to § 3–302 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) The election director in the county where an applicant resides shall
send a voter acknowledgment notice, in a format prescribed by the State Board, to each

HOUSE BILL 454
applicant informing the applicant whether he or she is qualified to become registered, and,
if not qualified, the reasons why.
(2) (i) A voter notification card sent to a qualified applicant may serve
as a voter acknowledgment notice.
(ii) 1. The voter notification card shall contain the name and
address of the voter, the date of issue, and the district or ward and precinct of the voter.
2. The card is evidence that the individual to whom it is
issued is a registered voter on the date appearing on the card.
3. The election director shall issue a replacement card on
request of the voter and a new card when a relevant change is made in the voter’s
registration record if the voter continues to reside in the county.
3–305.
(e) (1) The State Board shall adopt regulations and procedures in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the administration of voter registration during
early voting.
(2) THE REGULATIONS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A PROCESS TO VERIFY AN APPLICANT’S U.S. CITIZENSHIP
THROUGH THE SAVE PROGRAM; AND
(II) AN APPEAL PROCESS TO DISPUTE REPORTS OF THE SAVE
PROGRAM THAT AN INDIVIDUAL LACKS U.S. CITIZENSHIP IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
3–603 OF THIS TITLE.
3–306.
(e) (1) The State Board shall adopt regulations and procedures in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the administration of voter registration on election
day.
(2) THE REGULATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A PROCESS TO VERIFY AN APPLICANT’S U.S. CITIZENSHIP
THROUGH THE SAVE PROGRAM; AND

HOUSE BILL 454 5
(II) AN APPEAL PROCESS TO DISPUTE REPORTS OF THE SAVE
PROGRAM THAT AN INDIVIDUAL LACKS U.S. CITIZENSHIP IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
3–603 OF THIS TITLE.
3–504.
(a) (1) (i) Information from the agencies specified in this paragraph shall
be reported to the State Administrator in a format and at times prescribed by the State
Board.
(ii) The Maryland Department of Health shall report the names and
residence addresses (if known) of all individuals at least 16 years of age reported deceased
within the State since the date of the last report.
(iii) Each month, the clerk of the circuit court for each county and the
administrative clerk for each District Court shall report the names and addresses of all
individuals convicted, in the respective court, of a felony and sentenced to imprisonment
with commitment papers.
(iv) The clerk of the circuit court for each county shall report the
former and present names and residence addresses (if known) of all individuals whose
names have been changed by decree or order of the court since the date of the last report.
(2) The State Administrator shall make arrangements with the clerk of the
United States District Court for the District of Maryland to receive reports of names and
addresses, if available, of individuals convicted of a felony in that court and sentenced to
imprisonment with commitment papers.
(3) The State Administrator shall make arrangements with the United
States Social Security Administration or an entity that receives information from the Social
Security Administration and is approved by the State Administrator to receive reports of
names and addresses, if available, of all Maryland residents at least 16 years of age who
are reported deceased.
(4) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL MAKE ARRANGEMENTS WITH
U.S. CITIZENSHIP AND IMMIGRATION SERVICES TO RECEIVE REPORTS OF NAMES
OF MARYLAND RESIDENTS THAT HAVE BEEN SUBMITTED TO THE SAVE PROGRAM
FOR VERIFICATION OF U.S. CITIZENSHIP FOR THE PURPOSE OF VOTER
REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(b) (1) The State Administrator shall transmit to the appropriate local board
information gathered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
3–603.

HOUSE BILL 454
(A) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE
BOARD, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DISPUTES A REPORT OF THE SAVE PROGRAM THAT
THE INDIVIDUAL LACKS U.S. CITIZENSHIP MAY FILE AN APPEAL WITH THE STATE
BOARD.
(B) WHENEVER A REPORT IS RECEIVED FROM THE SAVE PROGRAM UNDER
§ 3–504(A)(4) OF THIS TITLE WITH THE NAME OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS APPLIED
TO REGISTER OR REGISTERED TO VOTE BUT IS NOT A U.S. CITIZEN, THE
APPROPRIATE ELECTION DIRECTOR SHALL MAIL TO THE ADDRESS SHOWN ON THE
VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION OR STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST, BY
REGULAR U.S. MAIL, A NOTICE OF INELIGIBILITY STATING:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A U.S. CITIZEN AS REPORTED BY THE
SAVE PROGRAM;
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL IS INELIGIBLE TO REGISTER TO VOTE UNDER §
3–102 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL APPEALS THE SAVE PROGRAM REPORT
OF LACK OF U.S. CITIZENSHIP IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION IS
REJECTED; OR
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL WILL BE REMOVED FROM THE STATEWIDE
VOTER REGISTRATION LIST.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES A NOTICE OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY:
(1) FILE AN APPEAL TO THE REFUSAL TO REGISTER OR THE REMOVAL
FROM THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST WITH THE STATE BOARD; AND
(2) PROVIDE DOCUMENTARY EVIDENCE SATISFACTORY TO THE
STATE BOARD OF U.S. CITIZENSHIP.
(D) (1) IF THE INDIVIDUAL FILES A TIMELY APPEAL UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR MAY, AFTER CONSIDERATION OF
THE DOCUMENTARY EVIDENCE PROVIDED, DIRECT AN ELECTION DIRECTOR TO:
(I) ADD THE INDIVIDUAL TO THE STATEWIDE VOTER
REGISTRATION LIST;

HOUSE BILL 454 7
(II) TERMINATE THE REMOVAL PROCESS AND RETAIN THE
INDIVIDUAL ON THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST; OR
(III) REFER THE MATTER TO THE LOCAL BOARD FOR A HEARING
TO DETERMINE THE INDIVIDUAL’S U.S. CITIZENSHIP.
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES A NOTICE OF INELIGIBILITY
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FAILS TO FILE TIMELY AN APPEAL, THE
ELECTION DIRECTOR SHALL:
(I) REJECT THE INDIVIDUAL’S VOTER REGISTRATION
APPLICATION; OR
(II) CANCEL THE INDIVIDUAL’S VOTER REGISTRATION AND
REMOVE THE INDIVIDUAL FROM THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST.
(E) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF AN APPEAL
PROCESS FOR DISPUTES OF A REPORT OF THE SAVE PROGRAM THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL LACKS U.S. CITIZENSHIP.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.